FOMA_Scripts/fullgerman.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +NN +Masc +Fem +Neut +Sg +Plural +Nom +Acc +Dat +Gen +Umlaut +V +Infinit +PastP +Present +um -a -is -us +umu +uma +umo -on -s -um +prefix +ge

LEXICON Root
NFem_0_n ;
NMasc_en_en ;
NMasc_s_$;
VVReg;
NFem-a/en ;
NFem-in;
NFem-is/en;
NFem-is/iden;
NFem-s/$sse;
NFem-s/sse;
NFem-s/ssen;
NFem/Sg;
NFem_0_$;
NFem_0_e;
NFem_0_$e;
NFem_0_en;
Nq/Pl_x;
NFem_0_s;
NFem_0_n;
NMasc-s/Sg;
NMasc-ns;
NMasc-s/$sse;
NMasc-us/en;
NMasc/Sg_es;
NMasc_en_en;
NMasc/Sg_s;
NMasc_0_x;
NMasc-s/sse;
NMasc-us/i;
NMasc/Sg_0;
NMasc_es_$e;
NMasc_es_$er;
NMasc_es_e;
NMasc_es_en;
NMasc_n_n;
NMasc_s_$x;
NMasc_s_0;
NMasc_s_e;
NMasc_s_en;
NMasc_s_n;
NMasc_s_s;
NMasc_s_x;
NNeut-0/ien;
NNeut-Herz;
NNeut-a/en;
NNeut-on/a;
NNeut-s/$sser;
NNeut-um/a;
NNeut-a/ata;
NMasc_s_$x;
NNeut-um/en;
NNeut/Pl;
NNeut/Sg_s;
NNeut/Sg_es;
NNeut_0_x;
NNeut_es_$e;
NNeut_es_e;
NNeut_es_en;
NNeut_es_er;
NNeut_s_$;
NNeut_s_0;
NNeut_s_e;
NNeut_s_en;
NNeut_s_n;
NNeut_s_s;
NNeut_es_$er;
NNeut_s_x;


LEXICON Nq/Pl_x
Peanuts    Nq/Pl_xSPinf;
Ferien     Nq/Pl_xSPinf;
Eltern     Nq/Pl_xSPinf;




LEXICON Nq/Pl_xSPinf
+NN+Nom+Plural:0 #;
+NN+Acc+Plural:0 #;
+NN+Dat+Plural:0 #;
+NN+Gen+Plural:0 #;


LEXICON NMasc-s/Sg
Hass+NN+Nom+Sg:Hass #;
Hass+NN+Acc+Sg:Hass #;
Hass+NN+Dat+Sg:Hase #;
Hass+NN+Dat+Sg:Hases #;
Hass+NN+Gen+Sg:Hasses #;



LEXICON NFem-s/$sse
Nuss+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:Nuss #;
Nuss+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:Nuss #;
Nuss+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:Nuss #;
Nuss+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:Nuss #;

Nuss+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural+Umlaut:Nüsse #;
Nuss+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural+Umlaut:Nüsse #;
Nuss+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural+Umlaut:Nüssen #;
Nuss+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural+Umlaut:Nüsse #;

LEXICON NFem-s/ssen
Stewardess+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:Stewardess #;
Stewardess+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:Stewardess #;
Stewardess+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:Stewardess #;
Stewardess+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:Stewardess #;

Stewardess+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural:Stewardessen #;
Stewardess+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural:Stewardessen #;
Stewardess+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural:Stewardessen #;
Stewardess+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural:Stewardessen #;

LEXICON NNeut-Herz
Herz+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:Herz #;
Herz+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:Herz #;
Herz+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:Herz #;
Herz+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:Herzen #;
Herz+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:Herzs #;
Herz+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:Herzen #;
Herz+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:Herzen #;
Herz+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:Herzen #;
Herz+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:Herzen #;




LEXICON NMasc_en_enSPinf
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^en  #;
+Masc+NN+Sg:0   #;
+Masc+NN+Plural:^en  #;


LEXICON NFem_0_nSPinf
+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural:^n #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural:^n #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural:^n #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural:^n #;

LEXICON VVRegSPinf
+V+Infinit:^en #;
+V+PastP:^+get #;



LEXICON NFem-a/en
Agenda    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Aktiva    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Arena    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Aula    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Aura    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Basilika    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Diva    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Donna    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Fauna    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Firma    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Harmonika    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Junta    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Kassa    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Lava    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Liga    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Marina    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Mensa    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Mora    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Nomenklatura    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Orchestra    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Peseta    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Prima    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Ära    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Razzia    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Regatta    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Sauna    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Skala    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Soja    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Summa    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Tombola    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Tuba    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Vega    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Veranda    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Villa    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Viola    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Vita    NFem-a/enSPinf;
Agenda    NFem-a/enSPinf;

LEXICON NFem-a/enSPinf
+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural:-a^en #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural:-a^en #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural:-a^en #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural:-a^en #;

LEXICON  NFem-in
Autorin    NFem-inSPinf;
Bäuerin    NFem-inSPinf;
Forscherin    NFem-inSPinf;
Heroin    NFem-inSPinf;
Künstlerin    NFem-inSPinf;
Lehrerin    NFem-inSPinf;
Malerin    NFem-inSPinf;
Mieterin    NFem-inSPinf;
Mitarbeiterin    NFem-inSPinf;
Politikerin    NFem-inSPinf;
Polizistin    NFem-inSPinf;
Prinzessin    NFem-inSPinf;
Ärztin    NFem-inSPinf;
Schülerin    NFem-inSPinf;
Schriftstellerin    NFem-inSPinf;
Sopranistin    NFem-inSPinf;
Studentin    NFem-inSPinf;
Teilnehmerin    NFem-inSPinf;
Wissenschaftlerin    NFem-inSPinf;
Forscherin    NFem-inSPinf;

LEXICON NFem-inSPinf
+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural:^nen #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural:^nen #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural:^nen #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural:^nen #;

LEXICON NFem-is/en
Basis    NFem-is/enSPinf;
Dosis    NFem-is/enSPinf;
Krisis    NFem-is/enSPinf;
Metropolis    NFem-is/enSPinf;
Praxis    NFem-is/enSPinf;
Thesis    NFem-is/enSPinf;
Krisis    NFem-is/enSPinf;

LEXICON NFem-is/enSPinf
+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural:-is^en #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural:-is^en #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural:-is^en #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural:-is^en #;

LEXICON NFem-is/iden
Bronchitis    NFem-is/idenSPinf;
Meningitis    NFem-is/idenSPinf;
Meningitis    NFem-is/idenSPinf;

LEXICON NFem-is/idenSPinf
+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural:-is^iden #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural:-is^iden #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural:-is^iden #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural:-is^iden #;

LEXICON NFem-s/sse
Ananas    NFem-s/sseSPinf;
Bedrängnis    NFem-s/sseSPinf;
Befugnis    NFem-s/sseSPinf;
Besorgnis    NFem-s/sseSPinf;
Erfordernis    NFem-s/sseSPinf;
Erkenntnis    NFem-s/sseSPinf;
Erlaubnis    NFem-s/sseSPinf;
Kenntnis    NFem-s/sseSPinf;
Vorkenntnis    NFem-s/sseSPinf;
Wildnis    NFem-s/sseSPinf;
Wildnis    NFem-s/sseSPinf;

LEXICON NFem-s/sseSPinf
+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural:^se #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural:^se #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural:^sen #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural:^se #;


LEXICON  NFem/SgSPinf
+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:0  #;

LEXICON NFem_0_$
Gebärmutter    NFem_0_$SPinf;
Grossmutter    NFem_0_$SPinf;
Mangel    NFem_0_$SPinf;
Mutter    NFem_0_$SPinf;
Tochter    NFem_0_$SPinf;
Tochter    NFem_0_$SPinf;

LEXICON NFem_0_$SPinf
+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural+Umlaut:+um^ #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural+Umlaut:+um^ #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural+Umlaut:+um^n #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural+Umlaut:+um^ #;

LEXICON NFem_0_$e
Abluft    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Angst    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Arbeitskraft    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Auskunft    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Axt    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Bank    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Braut    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Brunst    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Brust    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Faust    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Fledermaus    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Frucht    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Gans    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Gruft    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Hand    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Hauptstadt    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Haut    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Hilfskraft    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Innenstadt    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Kluft    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Kraft    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Kuh    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Kunst    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Laus    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Luft    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Lust    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Macht    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Magd    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Maus    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Nacht    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Naht    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Not    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Nuss    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Sau    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Schnur    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Schutzwand    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Sehnsucht    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Stadt    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Sucht    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Unterkunft    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Wand    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Wurst    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Zunft    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Zusammenkunft    NFem_0_$eSPinf;
Unterkunft    NFem_0_$eSPinf;

LEXICON NFem_0_$eSPinf
+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural+Umlaut:+um^e #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural+Umlaut:+um^e #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural+Umlaut:+um^en #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural+Umlaut:+um^e #;

LEXICON NFem_0_n
Attrappe    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Bleiche    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Diagnose    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Etage    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Force    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Gruppe    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Inanspruchnahme    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Klage    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Larve    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Marge    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Moschee    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Pappe    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Pornographie    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Ressource    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Schleife    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Sosse    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Säure    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Trompete    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Wendel    NFem_0_nSPinf;
LEXICON NMasc_en_en
Alpinist    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Assistent    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Automat    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Bassist    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Brunn    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Choreograph    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Demonstrant    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Dissident    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Essayist    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Favorit    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Freiherr    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Germanist    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Idiot    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Kabarettist    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Komponist    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Literat    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Musikant    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Pessimist    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Prälat    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Referent    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Sozialist    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Trabant    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
LEXICON VVReg
applaudier    VVRegSPinf;
beacht    VVRegSPinf;
befestig    VVRegSPinf;
behüt    VVRegSPinf;
benachrichtig    VVRegSPinf;
berichtig    VVRegSPinf;
besag    VVRegSPinf;
bestreb    VVRegSPinf;
bewerkstellig    VVRegSPinf;
bomb    VVRegSPinf;
chauffier    VVRegSPinf;
deputier    VVRegSPinf;
dramatisier    VVRegSPinf;
emittier    VVRegSPinf;
entschädig    VVRegSPinf;
ereil    VVRegSPinf;
erspiel    VVRegSPinf;
fühl    VVRegSPinf;
garnier    VVRegSPinf;
haft    VVRegSPinf;
infizier    VVRegSPinf;
klassier    VVRegSPinf;
kooperier    VVRegSPinf;
leucht    VVRegSPinf;
modifizier    VVRegSPinf;
patrouillier    VVRegSPinf;
projizier    VVRegSPinf;
reg    VVRegSPinf;
rund    VVRegSPinf;
schöpf    VVRegSPinf;
spalt    VVRegSPinf;
streik    VVRegSPinf;
torpedier    VVRegSPinf;
veranstalt    VVRegSPinf;
vergüt    VVRegSPinf;
verpack    VVRegSPinf;
versuch    VVRegSPinf;
weil    VVRegSPinf;
zock    VVRegSPinf;
LEXICON NFem/Sg
Anarchie    NFem/SgSPinf;
Anziehung    NFem/SgSPinf;
Astronomie    NFem/SgSPinf;
Ausschau    NFem/SgSPinf;
Übersicht    NFem/SgSPinf;
Brisanz    NFem/SgSPinf;
Couture    NFem/SgSPinf;
Dramaturgie    NFem/SgSPinf;
Eintracht    NFem/SgSPinf;
Esoterik    NFem/SgSPinf;
Öffentlichkeit    NFem/SgSPinf;
Flucht    NFem/SgSPinf;
Geborgenheit    NFem/SgSPinf;
Geografie    NFem/SgSPinf;
Ägide    NFem/SgSPinf;
Gymnastik    NFem/SgSPinf;
Heimat    NFem/SgSPinf;
Heuer    NFem/SgSPinf;
Hygiene    NFem/SgSPinf;
Influenza    NFem/SgSPinf;
Jugend    NFem/SgSPinf;
Ökologie    NFem/SgSPinf;
Krida    NFem/SgSPinf;
Lee    NFem/SgSPinf;
Marienkirche    NFem/SgSPinf;
Meteorologie    NFem/SgSPinf;
Mitternacht    NFem/SgSPinf;
Musikalität    NFem/SgSPinf;
Ohnmacht    NFem/SgSPinf;
Petit    NFem/SgSPinf;
Propaganda    NFem/SgSPinf;
Rage    NFem/SgSPinf;
Rührung    NFem/SgSPinf;
Schwermut    NFem/SgSPinf;
Statt    NFem/SgSPinf;
Umwelt    NFem/SgSPinf;
Verhütung    NFem/SgSPinf;
Werkstatt    NFem/SgSPinf;
Staatsduma    NFem/SgSPinf;
LEXICON NFem_0_n
Adresse    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Aushilfe    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Bohne    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Distel    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Exekutive    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Freikarte    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Harmonie    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Jause    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Klette    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Legende    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Maske    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Mutter    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Parteinahme    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Prise    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Rinde    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Schnauze    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Spalte    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Szene    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Type    NFem_0_nSPinf;
Wimper    NFem_0_nSPinf;
LEXICON NMasc_en_en
Advokat    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Asylant    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Bolid    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Debütant    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Elefant    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Fink    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Gladiator    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Informant    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Kandidat    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Konsument    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Marxist    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Ochs    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Pianist    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Propagandist    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Reservist    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Statist    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
Tropf    NMasc_en_enSPinf;
